Utah statutes.
70A-4-404.   Bank not obligated to pay check more than six months old.
A bank is under no obligation to a customer having a checking account to pay a
check, other than a certified check, which is presented more than six months
after its date, but it may charge its customer's account for a payment made
thereafter in good faith.
